Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,153
Terms, defined.

For purposes of
the Business Innovation Act:

(1) Department
means the Department of Economic Development;

(2) Distressed area means
a municipality, a county with a population of fewer than one hundred thousand
inhabitants according to the most recent federal decennial census, an unincorporated
area within a county, or a census tract in Nebraska that (a) has an unemployment
rate which exceeds the statewide average unemployment rate, (b) has a per
capita income below the statewide average per capita income, or (c) had a
population decrease between the two most recent federal decennial censuses;

(3) Federal
grant program means the federal Small Business Administration's Small Business
Innovation Research grant program;

(4) Microenterprise means a for-profit business
entity with not more than ten full-time equivalent employees;

(5) Prototype
means an original model on which something is patterned by a resident of Nebraska
or a company located in Nebraska; and

(6) Value-added agriculture means increasing
the net worth of food or nonfood agricultural products by processing, alternative
production and handling methods, collective marketing, or other innovative
practices.

Laws 2011, LB387, § 2.
December 1, 2021